New York, session 2025-2026, A7655.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 95 of the social services law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 12 to read as follows: 3 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary and to 4 the extent not inconsistent with federal law and regulations, the 5 department shall, within ninety days after the effective date of this 6 subdivision, apply for a waiver or request authorization from the feder- 7 al government to ensure that supplemental nutrition assistance program 8 (SNAP) benefits are able to be used for menstrual products including, 9 but not limited to, products used for the purpose of catching menstrua- 10 tion and vaginal discharge, including but not limited to tampons, pads, 11 and menstrual cups which can be either disposable or reusable. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided that section one 13 of this act shall take effect only upon the occurrence of the waiver or 14 authorization from the federal government provided for in such section; 15 provided further that the office of temporary and disability assistance 16 shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon the occur- 17 rence of such waiver or authorization in order that the commission may 18 maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text 19 of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 20 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 21 public officers law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06461-01-5